District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

16-2923

Wife or husband as party to partition proceeding.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 598, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 561, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(k)(3)
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 803(c)(3), 48 DCR 2087

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2923.
1973 Ed., § 16-2923.